Florida, session 2026, SB914.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âPresent subsections (3) through (8) of section 20 468.203, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 21 through (10), respectively, and new subsections (3) and (4) are 22 added to that section, to read: 23 468.203âDefinitions.âAs used in this act, the term: 24 (3)ââDry needlingâ means a skilled intervention, based on 25 Western medicine, that uses filiform needles and other apparatus 26 or equipment to stimulate a myofascial trigger point for the 27 evaluation and management of neuromusculoskeletal conditions, 28 pain, movement impairments, and disabilities. 29 (4)ââMyofascial trigger pointâ means an irritable section 30 of soft tissue often associated with palpable nodules in taut 31 bands of muscle fibers. 32 Section 2.âSection 468.222, Florida Statutes, is created to 33 read: 34 468.222âDry needling.â 35 (1)âThe board shall establish minimum standards of practice 36 for the performance of dry needling by occupational therapists, 37 including, at a minimum, all of the following: 38 (a)âCompletion of 2 years of licensed practice as an 39 occupational therapist. 40 (b)âCompletion of 50 hours of face-to-face continuing 41 education from an entity approved by the board on the topic of 42 dry needling. To satisfy this requirement, the instructor of the 43 continuing education must make a determination that the 44 occupational therapist demonstrates the requisite psychomotor 45 skills to safely perform dry needling. The continuing education 46 must include instruction in all of the following areas: 47 1.âTheory of dry needling. 48 2.âSelection and safe handling of needles and other 49 apparatus or equipment used in dry needling, including 50 instruction on the proper handling of biohazardous waste. 51 3.âIndications and contraindications for dry needling. 52 4.âPsychomotor skills needed to safely perform dry 53 needling. 54 5.âPostintervention care, including care for adverse 55 responses, adverse incident recordkeeping, and any reporting 56 obligations. 57 (c)1.âCompletion of at least 25 patient sessions of dry 58 needling performed under the supervision of an occupational 59 therapist, a physical therapist, or a chiropractic physician who 60 holds an active license to practice in any state or the District 61 of Columbia and has actively performed dry needling for at least 62 1 year. The supervising practitioner must document that the 63 occupational therapist under his or her supervision has met the 64 supervision and competency requirements specified by board rule 65 and does not need additional supervised sessions to safely 66 perform dry needling; or 67 2.âCompletion of 25 patient sessions of dry needling 68 performed as an occupational therapist, physical therapist, or 69 chiropractic physician licensed in another state or in the 70 United States Armed Forces. 71 (d)âA requirement that dry needling be performed only if 72 the patient consents to the treatment and it is part of the 73 patientâs documented plan of care. 74 (e)âA requirement prohibiting the delegation of dry 75 needling to any person other than an occupational therapist who 76 is authorized to perform dry needling under this part. 77 (2)âThe board shall establish additional supervision and 78 training requirements that an occupational therapist must meet 79 before performing dry needling on the head, neck, or torso if 80 the board deems such requirements necessary for patient safety. 81 (3)âThe Department of Health shall, within existing 82 resources, submit a report to the President of the Senate and 83 the Speaker of the House of Representatives on or before 84 December 31, 2028, detailing the total number of occupational 85 therapists licensed in this state, the number of occupational 86 therapists who perform dry needling in this state, any increases 87 or decreases in the number of occupational therapists in this 88 state by geographic area, and the number of any adverse 89 incidents, as defined by board rule, involving the performance 90 of dry needling by occupational therapists in this state. 91 (4)âThe performance of dry needling in the practice of 92 occupational therapy may not be construed to limit the scope of 93 practice of other licensed health care practitioners not 94 governed by this chapter. 95 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.